Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-957
Cold storage plants; construction; cost; tax; bonds.

The cost of such utilities may be defrayed by the levy of a tax of not to exceed three and five-tenths cents on each one hundred dollars upon the taxable value of the taxable property within the corporate limits of such city or village in any one year for a cold storage or refrigeration plant or, when such tax is insufficient for the purpose, by the issuance of bonds of the municipality.

Laws 1941, c. 24, § 2, p. 118;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 17-802;

R.S.1943, § 17-957;

Laws 1953, c. 287, § 25, p. 945;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 64;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 10;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 10.